Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 6
COMMISSION ON FAMILY MEDICINE

Editor's note:

This part 6 was added with relocations in 2017. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

25.5-1-601. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Physicians engaged in family medicine are in critically short supply in this state;

Because of the distribution of such physicians, many rural and urban areas of the state are underserved;

A significant portion of the state population is medically underserved because of indigency;

Family physicians provide health care to all segments of the population;

The provision of more competent family physicians is a public purpose of great importance; and

The creation of the commission on family medicine is a desirable, necessary, and cost-effective means of addressing the needs described in this subsection (1).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1024), ch. 7, p. 19, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-901 as it existed prior to 2017.

25.5-1-602. Commission created - composition - terms of office.

There is created, in the department of health care policy and financing, the commission on family medicine, referred to in this part 6 as the "commission". The commission consists of the following members:

The deans of accredited allopathic and osteopathic schools of medicine in the state or their designated representatives;

The director of all family medicine programs in the state accredited by the accreditation council on graduate medical education of the American medical association or the American osteopathic association;

A representative of the Colorado academy of family physicians; and

A health-care consumer to be appointed by the governor from each congressional district in the state. No more than a minimum majority of the members of the commission appointed by the governor pursuant to this subsection (1)(d) may be affiliated with the same political party. A vacancy on the commission occurs whenever any health-care consumer member moves out of the congressional district from which the member was appointed. A health-care consumer member who moves out of the congressional district shall promptly notify the governor of the date of the move, but notice is not necessary for the vacancy to occur. The governor shall fill the vacancy in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

The members appointed under subsection (1)(d) of this section serve three-year terms. All members serve at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The commission shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson from among its members. Members of the commission serve without compensation, but members described in subsections (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) of this section are entitled to their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The commission shall meet on call of the chairperson, but not less than once every three months. A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1024), ch. 7, p. 20, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (1)(d), and (2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 63, § 86, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-902 as it existed prior to 2017.

25.5-1-603. Duties of commission - reporting.

The commission shall:

Assure that family medicine residency program standards are equal to or more stringent than the standards established by the accreditation council on graduate medical education of the American medical association or the American osteopathic association for residency training in family medicine;

In cooperation with the dean of the school of medicine, approve and recommend allocation of any funds which are identified and appropriated in the general appropriation bill as a line item for any community family medicine residency training program;

Monitor the state's family medicine residency programs and recommend from time to time that the general assembly appropriate funds for said programs;

Locate specific areas of the state which are underserved by family physicians and determine the priority of need among such areas;

Offer to the general assembly alternative ideas on providing medical care to the medically indigent in the state; and

Support the development and maintenance of family medicine residency programs in rural and other underserved areas of the state for purposes of cultivating family medicine practitioners who are likely to continue practicing in rural and underserved areas of the state at the conclusion of their residency programs.

On or before each November 1, the commission shall report to the office of state planning and budgeting and to the department of health care policy and financing concerning rural family medicine residency programs in the state and the role of the commission with respect to supporting the development and maintenance of those programs. In addition, notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11), the commission shall present the report to the joint budget committee as part of its annual presentation to that committee.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1024), ch. 7, p. 20, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-903 as it existed prior to 2017.